Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-153
Owner's statement of apportionment of lien; recording; contents.

An owner who is entitled to apportion a lien among lots of a platted subdivision of record may record a statement making the apportionment. The statement must refer to the record location of the lien being apportioned, state the name of the owner and the claimant, state the date on which the demand to apportion was made on the claimant and that he or she has not apportioned, and make the apportionment.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 29.